California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(b) (1) In any appellate proceeding in which the child is an appellant, the court of appeal shall appoint separate counsel for the child. If the
 child is not an appellant, the court of appeal shall appoint separate counsel for the child if the court of appeal determines, after considering the recommendation of the trial counsel or guardian ad litem appointed for the child pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 317, Section 326.5, and California Rule of Court 5.662, that appointment of counsel would benefit the child. In order to assist the court of appeal in making its determination under this subdivision, the trial counsel or guardian ad litem shall make a recommendation to the court of appeal that separate counsel be appointed in any case in which the trial counsel or guardian ad litem determines that, for the purposes of the appeal, the child’s best interests cannot be protected without the appointment of separate counsel, and shall set forth the reasons why the appointment is in the child’s best interests. The court of appeal shall consider that recommendation when determining whether the child would benefit from the appointment of counsel. The
 Judicial Council shall implement this provision by adopting a rule of court on or before July 1, 2007, to set forth the procedures by which the trial counsel or guardian ad litem may participate in an appeal, as well as the factors to be considered by the trial counsel or guardian ad litem in making a recommendation to the court of appeal, including, but not limited to, the extent to which there exists a potential conflict between the interests of the child and the interests of any respondent.

(2) The Judicial Council shall report to the Legislature on or before July 1, 2008, information regarding the status of appellate representation of dependent children, the results of implementing this subdivision, any recommendations regarding the representation of dependent children in appellate proceedings made by the California Judicial Council’s Blue Ribbon Commission on Children in Foster Care, any actions taken, including rules of court proposed or
 adopted, in response to those recommendations or taken in order to comply with the Child Abuse Prevention and Treatment Act, as well as any recommendations for legislative change that are deemed necessary to protect the best interests of dependent children in appellate proceedings or ensure compliance with the Child Abuse Prevention and Treatment Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 293.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13.5. Foster Care of Children [396. - 452.]

396.

It is the policy of the Legislature that foster care should be a temporary method of care for the children of this state, that children have a right to a normal home life free from abuse, that reunification with the natural parent or parents or another alternate permanent living situation such as adoption or guardianship is more suitable to a child’s well-being than is foster care, that this state has a responsibility to attempt to ensure that children are given the chance to have happy and healthy lives, and that, to the extent possible, the current practice of moving children receiving foster care services from one foster home to another until they reach the age of majority should be discontinued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 620, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

397.

In order to carry out the policy stated in Section 396, each county welfare department or probation department shall report to the State Department of Social Services, in the frequency and format determined by the department, foster care characteristic data and care information deemed essential by the department to establish a foster care information system. The report shall include, but not be limited to, elements that identify the factors necessitating foster care placement, the appropriateness of the placement, and the case goal or objective such as reunification, adoption, guardianship, or long-term foster care placement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1229, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

399.

Any minor being considered for placement in a foster home shall have the right to make a brief statement to the court making a decision on placement. The court may disregard any preferences expressed by the minor. The minor’s right to make a statement shall not be limited to the initial placement, but shall continue for any proceedings concerning continued placement or a decision to return to parental custody.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 317, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

400.

Any county may institute a program of advocates for pupils in foster care placement. A participating county shall be responsible for the nonfederal costs of implementing the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 811, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

401.

The program shall utilize educational advocates to assist children in foster care through the educational system. To the extent possible, an advocate shall reflect the same racial or ethnic identification as the pupil being assisted. The educational advocates shall be required to comply with all statutory and regulatory provisions regarding standards of confidentiality that are applicable to children of schoolage who have been placed in foster care. The responsibilities of an advocate shall include at least the following duties:

(a) Facilitating the school enrollment of pupils in foster care.

(b) Locating a pupil’s transcripts, immunization and school health records, individual education plans, and having these documents sent to the school to which the child is applying for enrollment, and to the department so that the information can be included in the child’s health and education passport.

(c) Educating foster parents regarding how to enroll the pupil in school and what educational services are available.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 811, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

402.

An advocate and a county participating in this program shall be held harmless by the state when acting in their official capacity except for acts or omissions that are found to have been wanton, reckless, or malicious.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 811, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

403.

An advocate shall not be assigned to assist any minor in foster care placement who has been appointed a surrogate parent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 811, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

404.

Any school district that has a foster youth services program shall not be eligible to participate in the program authorized by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 811, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

450.

(a) A minor or nonminor who satisfies all of the following criteria is within the transition jurisdiction of the juvenile court:

(1) (A) The minor is a ward who is older than 17 years and 5 months of age and younger than 18 years of age and in foster care placement, or the nonminor is a ward in foster care placement who was a ward subject to an order for foster care placement on the day the nonminor attained 18 years of age and has not attained 21 years of age.

(B) The minor or nonminor met or would meet the criteria in subparagraph (A), but for the fact that the underlying adjudication was vacated
 pursuant to Section 236.14 of the Penal Code or dismissed pursuant to Section 782 of this code, and the minor or nonminor has not attained 21 years of age.

(2) The ward meets any of the following conditions:

(A) The ward was removed from the physical custody of the ward’s parents or legal guardian, adjudged to be a ward of the juvenile court under Section 725, and ordered into foster care placement as a ward.

(B) The ward was removed from the custody of the ward’s parents or legal guardian as a dependent of the court with an order for foster care placement as a dependent in effect at the time the court adjudged them to be a ward of the juvenile court under Section 725.

(C) The minor or nonminor met or would meet the conditions described in subparagraph (A) or (B), but for the fact that the underlying adjudication was vacated pursuant to Section 236.14 of the Penal Code or dismissed pursuant to Section 782 of this code, and the minor or nonminor has not attained 21 years of age.

(3) The rehabilitative goals of the minor or nonminor, as set forth in the case plan, have been met, and juvenile court jurisdiction over the minor or nonminor as a ward is no longer required, or the underlying adjudication was vacated pursuant to Section 236.14 of the Penal Code or dismissed pursuant to Section 782 of this code.

(4) (A) If the ward is a minor, reunification services have been terminated; the matter has not been set for a
 hearing for termination of parental rights pursuant to Section 727.3 or for the establishment of guardianship pursuant to Section 728; the return of the child to the physical custody of the parents or legal guardian would create a substantial risk of detriment to the child’s safety, protection, or physical or emotional well-being; and the minor has indicated an intent to sign a mutual agreement, as described in subdivision (u) of Section 11400, with the responsible agency for placement in a supervised setting as a nonminor dependent.

(B) If the ward is a nonminor, the ward has signed a mutual agreement, as described in subdivision (u) of Section 11400, with the responsible agency for placement in a supervised setting as a nonminor dependent or has signed a voluntary reentry agreement, as described in subdivision (z) of Section 11400, for
 placement in a supervised setting as a nonminor dependent. A youth homelessness prevention center licensed by the State Department of Social Services pursuant to Section 1502.35 of the Health and Safety Code shall not be a placement option pursuant to this section.

(b) A minor who is subject to the court’s transition jurisdiction shall be referred to as a transition dependent.

(c) A youth subject to the court’s transition jurisdiction who is 18 years of age or older shall be referred to as a nonminor dependent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 782, Sec. 4.   (SB 1161)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

451.

(a) At a hearing during which termination of jurisdiction over a ward is considered, the court may, as an alternative to termination of jurisdiction, modify its order of jurisdiction and assume transition jurisdiction over the ward pursuant to Section 450. The court may also assume transition jurisdiction over a ward, transition dependent, or nonminor dependent whose underlying adjudication is vacated pursuant to Section 236.14 of the Penal Code or dismissed pursuant to Section 782 of this code.

(b) A minor or a nonminor who is subject to the court’s transition jurisdiction shall not be subject to any terms or conditions of probation, and their case shall be managed as a dependent child
 of the court or as a nonminor dependent of the court.

(c) Each county shall modify its protocol for Section 241.1 to include a provision to determine whether the child welfare services department or the probation department shall supervise persons subject to the court’s transition jurisdiction, including persons who obtained a court order vacating the underlying adjudication pursuant to Section 236.14 of the Penal Code. For a minor, this supervision shall comply with the requirements and procedures set forth in this code for dependent children. For a nonminor, this supervision shall comply with the provisions set forth in this code that specifically apply to nonminor dependents.

(d) The court shall appoint counsel, pursuant to Section 317, for minors and nonminors subject to the
 court’s transition jurisdiction. The court shall, to the extent feasible given local court circumstances, provide for continuity of representation for the minor or nonminor from delinquency jurisdiction to transition jurisdiction pursuant to Section 450 by the attorney appointed to represent the minor or nonminor pursuant to Section 634.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 782, Sec. 5.   (SB 1161)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

452.

(a) The court shall hold a hearing prior to terminating transition jurisdiction over a nonminor dependent.

(b) At a hearing during which termination of transition jurisdiction over a nonminor dependent is being considered, the court shall continue its jurisdiction to allow a nonminor dependent who is eligible for foster care placement pursuant to Section 11403 to remain in foster care, unless the court finds that after reasonable and documented efforts, the nonminor dependent cannot be located or does not wish to remain a nonminor dependent. In making this finding, the court shall ensure that the nonminor dependent has had an opportunity to confer with his or her counsel and has been informed of his or her
 options, including the right to reenter foster care placement by completing a voluntary reentry agreement, as described in subdivision (z) of Section 11400, and the right to file a petition pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 388 to resume transition jurisdiction pursuant to Section 450.

(c) The agency responsible under the county protocol for supervising a nonminor dependent subject to the court’s transition jurisdiction shall complete all of the following actions for a hearing during which termination of transition jurisdiction over a nonminor dependent is being considered:

(1) Ensure that the nonminor dependent is present in court for the hearing, unless the nonminor dependent has waived his or her right to appear in court and elects to appear by telephone instead or document the reasonable efforts it made to locate the nonminor dependent when the nonminor dependent is not
 available to appear at the hearing.

(2) Submit a report describing whether it is in the nonminor dependent’s best interests to remain under the court’s jurisdiction.

(3) Submit the completed 90-day transition plan.

(4) The placing agency’s report shall address the manner in which the nonminor was informed of his or her right to reenter foster care prior to attaining 21 years of age, if the nonminor dependent has indicated that he or she does not want juvenile court transition jurisdiction to continue.

(5) Submit written verification that the information, documents, and services set forth in paragraphs 1 to 8, inclusive, of subdivision (e) of Section 391 have been provided to the nonminor dependent.

(6) Certify that the requirements set forth in Section 607.5 have been completed.

(d) If the court terminates transition jurisdiction, the nonminor shall remain within the general jurisdiction of the court until the nonminor attains 21 years of age to allow for the filing of a petition to resume juvenile court transition jurisdiction under subdivision (e) of Section 388, although no review proceedings shall be required.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 459, Sec. 14.   (AB 212)   Effective October 4, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13.6. Serious Habitual Offenders [500. - 506.]

500.

The Legislature hereby finds that a substantial and disproportionate amount of serious crime is committed by a relatively small number of chronic juvenile offenders commonly known as serious habitual offenders. In enacting this article, the Legislature intends to support increased efforts by the juvenile justice system comprised of law enforcement, district attorneys, probation departments, juvenile courts, and schools to identify these offenders early in their careers, and to work cooperatively together to investigate and record their activities, prosecute them aggressively by using vertical prosecution techniques, sentence them appropriately, and to supervise them intensively in institutions and in the community. The Legislature further supports increased interagency efforts to gather comprehensive data and actively disseminate it to the agencies in the juvenile justice system, to produce more informed decisions by all agencies in that system, through organizational and operational techniques that have already proven their effectiveness in selected counties in this and other states.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1441, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

501.

(a) There is hereby established in the Office of Criminal Justice Planning a program of financial assistance for law enforcement, district attorneys, probation departments, juvenile courts, and schools, designated the Serious Habitual Offender Program. All funds appropriated to the Office of Criminal Justice Planning for the purposes of this article shall be administered and disbursed by the executive director of that office, and shall, to the greatest extent feasible, be coordinated or consolidated with federal funds that may be made available for these purposes.

(b) From moneys appropriated therefor, the Executive Director of the Office of Criminal Justice Planning may allocate and award funds to agencies in which programs are established in substantial compliance with the policies and criteria set forth in this article. Awards made to individual agencies shall not exceed three years in duration. An agency receiving an award shall provide matching funds at an increasing rate each year; the rate shall be as determined by the Office of Criminal Justice Planning for that agency.

(c) Allocation and award of funds for the purposes of this article shall be made upon application by a district attorney, a local law enforcement agency, a probation department, or a school district, that has been approved by the appropriate governing board of the particular agency. The applicant agency shall use the funds to create an information gathering and analysis unit responsible for the identification of serious habitual offenders and for the dissemination of information about the activities of those offenders to the juvenile justice system. This unit shall participate in the planning, support, and assistance of activities required in Sections 503 to 506, inclusive. Funds disbursed under this article shall not supplant local funds that would, in absence of the program established by this article, be made available to support the juvenile justice system. Local grant awards made under the program shall not be subject to review as specified in Section 14780 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1356, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

502.

(a) An individual shall be the subject of the efforts of programs established pursuant to this article who has been previously adjudged a ward pursuant to Section 602 and is described in any of the following paragraphs:

(1) Has accumulated five total arrests, three arrests for crimes chargeable as felonies and three arrests within the preceding 12 months.

(2) Has accumulated 10 total arrests, two arrests for crimes chargeable as felonies and three arrests within the preceding 12 months.

(3) Has been arrested once for three or more burglaries, robberies, or sexual assaults within the preceding 12 months.

(4) Has accumulated 10 total arrests, eight or more arrests for misdemeanor crimes of theft, assault, battery, narcotics or controlled substance possession, substance abuse, or use or possession of weapons, and has three arrests within the preceding 12 months.

(b) Arrests for infractions or conduct described in Section 601 shall not be utilized in determining whether an individual is described in subdivision (a). All arrests used in determining eligibility for selection for program participation that did not result in a sustained petition shall be certified by the prosecutor as having been provable.

(c) In applying the selection criteria set forth above, a program may elect to limit its efforts to persons described in one or more of the categories listed in subdivision (a), or specified felonies, if crime statistics demonstrate that the persons so identified present a particularly serious problem in the county, or that the incidence of the felonies so specified present a particularly serious problem in the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1441, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

503.

Programs funded under this article shall adopt and pursue the following policies:

(a) Each participating law enforcement agency shall do all of the following: 

(1) Gather data on identified serious habitual offenders.

(2) Compile data into a usable format for law enforcement, prosecutors, probation officers, schools, and courts pursuant to an interagency agreement.

(3) Regularly update data and disseminate data to juvenile justice system agencies, as needed.

(4) Establish local policies in cooperation with the prosecutor, the probation officer, schools, and the juvenile court regarding data collection, arrest, and detention of serious habitual offenders.

(5) Provide support and assistance to other agencies engaged in the program. 

(b) Each participating district attorney’s office shall do all of the following:

(1) File petitions based on the most serious provable offenses of each arrest of a serious habitual offender.

(2) Use all reasonable prosecutorial efforts to resist the release, where appropriate, of the serious habitual offender at all stages of the prosecution.

(3) Seek an admission of guilt on all offenses charged in the petition against the offender. The only cases in which the prosecutor may request the court to reduce or dismiss the charges shall be cases in which the prosecutor decides there is insufficient evidence to prove the people’s case, the testimony of a material witness cannot be obtained or a reduction or dismissal will not result in a substantial change in sentence. In those cases, the prosecutor shall file a written declaration with the court stating the specific factual and legal basis for such a reduction or dismissal and the court shall make specific findings on the record of its ruling and the reasons therefor.

(4) Vertically prosecute all cases involving serious habitual offenders, whereby the prosecutor who makes the initial filing decision or appearance on such a case shall perform all subsequent court appearances on that case through its conclusion, including the disposition phase.

(5) Make all reasonable prosecutorial efforts to persuade the court to impose the most appropriate sentence upon such an offender at the time of disposition. As used in this paragraph, “most appropriate sentence” means any disposition available to the juvenile court.

(6) Make all reasonable prosecutorial efforts to reduce the time between arrest and disposition of the charge.

(7) Act as liaison with the court and other criminal justice agencies to establish local policies regarding the program and to ensure interagency cooperation in the planning and implementation of the program.

(8) Provide support and assistance to other agencies engaged in the program. 

(c) Each participating probation department shall do all of the following:

(1) Cooperate in gathering data for use by all participating agencies pursuant to interagency agreement.

(2) Detain minors in custody who meet the detention criteria set forth in Section 628.

(3) Consider the data relating to serious habitual offenders when making all decisions regarding the identified individual and include relevant data in written reports to the court.

(4) Use all reasonable efforts to file violations of probation pursuant to Section 777 in a timely manner.

(5) Establish local policies in cooperation with law enforcement, the district attorney, schools, and the juvenile court regarding the program and provide support and assistance to other agencies engaged in the program.

(d) Each participating school district shall do all of the following:

(1) Cooperate in gathering data for use by all participating agencies pursuant to interagency agreement. School district access to records and data shall be limited to that information that is otherwise authorized by law.

(2) Report all crimes that are committed on campus by serious habitual offenders to law enforcement.

(3) Report all violations of probation committed on campus by serious habitual offenders to the probation officer or his or her designee.

(4) Provide educational supervision and services appropriate to serious habitual offenders attending schools.

(5) Establish local policies in cooperation with law enforcement, the district attorney, probation and the juvenile court regarding the program and provide support and assistance to other agencies engaged in the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 207.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

504.

The judge of the juvenile court shall authorize the inspection of juvenile court records, probation and protective services records, district attorney records, school records, and law enforcement records by the participating law enforcement agency charged with the compilation of the data relating to serious habitual offenders into the format used by all participating agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1441, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

505.

Within three months of implementation of the program, all participating agencies in a county shall execute a written interagency agreement outlining their role in the program, including the duties they will perform, the duties other agencies will perform for and with them, and the categories of information to be collected and the plan for its distribution and use. All participating agencies will meet no less than once each month to plan, implement, and refine the operation of the program and to exchange information about individuals subject to the program or other related topics.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1356, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

506.

Law enforcement agencies and district attorneys participating in programs funded pursuant to this article shall adopt procedures to require a check of juvenile criminal history of all adults whose cases are presented to the district attorney’s office for filing. The juvenile criminal history shall be considered by the district attorney in the charging decision and establishing the district attorney’s position on the appropriate plea and sentence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1441, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Wards—Jurisdiction [601. - 608.]

601.

(a) Any minor between 12 years of age and 17 years of age, inclusive, who persistently or habitually refuses to obey the reasonable and proper orders or directions of the minor’s parents, guardian, or custodian, or who is beyond the control of that person, or who is a minor between 12 years of age and 17 years of age, inclusive, when the minor violated any ordinance of any city or county of this state establishing a curfew based solely on age is within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court which may adjudge the minor to be a ward of the court.

(b) If a minor between 12 years of age and 17 years of age, inclusive, has four or more truancies within one school year as defined in Section 48260 of the Education Code or a school attendance review board or probation officer
 determines that the available public and private services are insufficient or inappropriate to correct the habitual truancy of the minor, or if the minor fails to respond to directives of a school attendance review board or probation officer or to services provided, the minor is then within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court which may adjudge the minor to be a ward of the court pursuant to this section. However, it is the intent of the Legislature that a minor who is described in this subdivision, adjudged a ward of the court pursuant solely to this subdivision, or found in contempt of court for failure to comply with a court order pursuant to this subdivision, shall not be held in a secure facility and shall not be removed from the custody of the parent or guardian except for the purposes of school attendance.

(c) To the extent practically feasible, a minor who is adjudged a ward of the court pursuant to this section shall not be permitted
 to come into or remain in contact with any minor ordered to participate in a truancy program, or the equivalent thereof, pursuant to Section 602.

(d) Any peace officer may issue a notice to appear to a minor who is within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court pursuant to this section. Before issuing a notice to appear under this subdivision, a peace officer shall refer a minor who is within the jurisdiction of this section to a community-based resource, the probation department, a health agency, a local educational agency, or other governmental entities that may provide services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 323, Sec. 7.   (AB 901)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

601.2.

In the event that a parent or guardian or person in charge of a minor described in Section 48264.5 of the Education Code fails to respond to directives of the school attendance review board or to services offered on behalf of the minor, the school attendance review board shall direct that the minor be referred to the probation department or to the county welfare department under Section 300, and the school attendance review board may require the school district to file a complaint against the parent, guardian, or other person in charge of such minor as provided in
 Section 48291 or Section 48454 of the Education Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1023, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

601.3.

(a) If the district attorney or the probation officer receives notice from the school district pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 48260.6 of the Education Code that a minor continues to be classified as a truant after the parents or guardians have been notified pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 48260.5 of the Education Code, or if the district attorney or the probation officer receives notice from the school attendance review board, or the district attorney receives notice from the probation officer, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 48263.5 of the Education Code that a minor continues to be classified as a truant after review and counseling by the school attendance review board or probation officer, the district attorney or the probation officer, or both, may request the
 parents or guardians and the child to attend a meeting in the district attorney’s office or at the probation department to discuss the possible legal consequences of the minor’s truancy.

(b) Notice of a meeting to be held pursuant to this section shall contain all of the following:

(1) The name and address of the person to whom the notice is directed.

(2) The date, time, and place of the meeting.

(3) The name of the minor classified as a truant.

(4) The section pursuant to which the meeting is requested.

(5) Notice that the district attorney may file a criminal complaint against the parents or guardians pursuant to Section
 48293 of the Education Code for failure to compel the attendance of the minor at school.

(c) Notice of a meeting to be held pursuant to this section shall be served at least five days prior to the meeting on each person required to attend the meeting. Service shall be made personally or by certified mail with return receipt requested.

(d) At the commencement of the meeting authorized by this section, the district attorney or the probation officer shall advise the parents or guardians and the child that any statements they make could be used against them in subsequent court proceedings.

(e) Upon completion of the meeting authorized by this section, the probation officer or the district attorney, after consultation with the probation officer, may file a petition pursuant to Section 601 if the district attorney or the
 probation officer determines that available community resources cannot resolve the truancy problem, or if the pupil or the parents or guardians of the pupil, or both, have failed to respond to services provided or to the directives of the school, the school attendance review board, the probation officer, or the district attorney.

(f) The truancy mediation program authorized by this section may be established by the district attorney or by the probation officer. The district attorney and the probation officer shall coordinate their efforts and shall cooperate in determining whether another public agency, a community-based organization, the probation department, or the district attorney is best able to operate a truancy mediation program in their county pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 323, Sec. 8.   (AB 901)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

601.4.

(a) The juvenile court judge may be assigned to sit as a superior court judge to hear any complaint alleging that a parent, guardian, or other person having control or charge of a minor has violated Section 48293 of the Education Code. The jurisdiction of the juvenile court granted by this section shall not be exclusive and the charge may be prosecuted instead in a superior court. However, upon motion, that action shall be transferred to the juvenile court.

(b) Notwithstanding
 Section 737 of the Penal Code, a violation of Section 48293 of the Education Code may be prosecuted pursuant to subdivision (a), by written complaint filed in the same manner as an infraction may be prosecuted. The juvenile court judge, sitting as a superior court judge, may coordinate the action involving the minor with any action involving the parent, guardian, or other person having control or charge of the minor. Both matters may be heard and decided at the same time unless the parent, guardian, other person having control or charge of the minor, or any member of the press or public objects to a closed hearing of the proceedings charging violation of Section 48293 of the Education Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 612.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

601.5.

(a) Any county may, upon adoption of a resolution by the board of supervisors, establish an At-Risk Youth Early Intervention Program designed to assess and serve families with children who have chronic behavioral problems that place the child at risk of becoming a ward of the juvenile court under Section 601 or 602. The purpose of the program is to provide a swift and local service response to youth behavior problems so that future involvement with the justice system may be avoided.

(b) The At-Risk Youth Early Intervention Program shall be designed and developed by a collaborative group which shall include representatives of the juvenile court, the probation department, the district attorney, the public defender, the county department of social services, the county education department, county health and mental health agencies, and local and community-based youth and family service providers.

(c) The At-Risk Youth Early Intervention Program shall include one or more neighborhood-based Youth Referral Centers for at-risk youth and their families. These Youth Referral Centers shall be flexibly designed by each participating county to serve the local at-risk youth population with family assessments, onsite services, and referrals to offsite services. The operator of a Youth Referral Center may be a private nonprofit community-based agency or a public agency, or both. A center shall be staffed by youth and family
 service counselors who may be public or private employees and who shall be experienced in dealing with at-risk youth who are eligible for the program, as described in subdivision (d). The center may also be staffed as a collaborative service model involving onsite youth and family counselors, probation officers, school representatives, health and mental health practitioners, or other service providers. A center shall be located at one or more community sites that are generally accessible to at-risk youth and families and shall be open during daytime, evening, and weekend hours, as appropriate, based upon local service demand and resources available to the program.

(d) A minor may be referred to a Youth Referral Center by a parent or guardian, a law enforcement officer, a probation officer, a child welfare agency, or a school, or a minor may self-refer. A minor may be referred to the program if the minor is at least 10 years of age and is
 believed by the referring source to be at risk of justice system involvement due to chronic disobedience to parents, curfew violations, repeat truancy, incidents of running away from home, experimentation with drugs or alcohol, or other serious behavior problems. Whenever a minor is referred to the program, the Youth Referral Center shall make an initial determination as to whether the minor is engaged in a pattern of at-risk behavior likely to result in future justice system involvement, and, if satisfied that the minor is significantly at risk, the center shall initiate a family assessment. The family assessment shall identify the minor’s behavioral problem, the family’s circumstances and relationship to the problem, and the needs of the minor or the family in relation to the behavioral problem. The assessment shall be performed using a risk and needs assessment instrument, based on national models of successful youth risk and needs assessment instruments and utilizing objective assessment criteria, as
 appropriate for the clientele served by the program. At a minimum, the assessment shall include information drawn from interviews with the minor and with the parents or other adults having custody of the minor, and it shall include information on the minor’s probation, school, health, and mental health status to the extent such information may be available and accessible.

(e) If the Youth Referral Center confirms upon assessment that the minor is at significant risk of future justice system involvement and that the minor may benefit from referral to services, the Youth Referral Center staff shall work with the minor and the parents to produce a written service plan to be implemented over a period of up to six months. The plan shall identify specific programs or services that are recommended by the center and are locally available to the minor and the family as a means of addressing the behavior problems that led to the referral. The plan may
 include a requirement that the minor obey reasonable rules of conduct at home or in school including reasonable home curfew and school attendance rules, while the service plan is being implemented. The plan may also require, as a condition of further participation in the program, that a parent or other family member engage in counseling, parenting classes, or other relevant activities. To the extent possible given available resources, the staff at the Youth Referral Center shall facilitate compliance with the service plan by assisting the minor and the family in making appointments with service providers, by responding to requests for help by the minor or the parent as they seek to comply with the plan, and by monitoring compliance until the plan is completed.
